Wyoming statutes. Title 42 Welfare
Article 1. In General
§ 42-4-104.
Powers and duties of department of health; state Medicaid agent appointed by governor.

The department of health shall:

Administer this chapter;

Develop a state plan for medical assistance and services provided to qualified recipients under this chapter and otherwise providing for the effective administration of this chapter;

Maintain records on the administration of this chapter, report to the federal government as required by federal law and regulation and within limitations imposed under W.S.

42-4-112

, may provide for the availability of information on the administration of this chapter to interested persons;

Adopt, amend and rescind rules and regulations on the administration of this chapter following notice and public hearing in accordance with the Wyoming Administrative Procedure Act.

In carrying out subsection (a) of this section, the department may:

Advise, consult and cooperate with any state agency or political subdivision, any other state, the federal government, private industry and other interested persons;

Negotiate and enter into contract with other public and private agencies and persons as necessary to administer this chapter;

Directly or by contract and through one (1) or more fiscal intermediaries, provide payments to providers of services and supplies for medical assistance authorized by this chapter in the manner and amount provided by this chapter;

Receive funds from any source for purposes of carrying out this chapter;

Establish reasonable limits on services and supplies authorized under W.S.

42-4-103

;

Conduct pilot projects pursuant to W.S. 42-4-107(c);

Provide for part or all of the services and supplies authorized under W.S.

42-4-103

for some or all categorically eligible individuals through health care insurance or through contracts with networks of health care providers;

Purchase stop gap insurance;

Enter into intergovernmental transfer arrangements with qualifying facilities and providers, including but not limited to hospitals, nursing homes, hospital owned and operated professional service providers and ground ambulance service providers, in which all federal funding received as a result of the intergovernmental transfer arrangements shall be distributed to participating facilities and providers in accordance with the terms of an approved state plan amendment or other agreement with the centers for Medicare and Medicaid services. Notwithstanding, if consistent with the state plan amendment or agreement, the department may use funds derived from such intergovernmental transfers to pay administrative expenses incurred by the department or its agent in performing the activities authorized under this subsection, provided that these expenses shall not exceed a total of three percent (3%) of the aggregate intergovernmental transfer funds collected in the fiscal year;

Provide for the withholding of medical assistance payments from nursing care facilities in accordance with W.S. 42-8-107(b)(i).

Subject to limitations imposed under this subsection, the department shall, at least once every five (5) years but not more than once in any three (3) year period, establish a new base period to be used in calculating all skilled nursing homes’ medical assistance per diem base rate reimbursable under this chapter, using the most recent cost report information provided to the department. For purposes of medical assistance reimbursable under this chapter, the department shall reimburse each eligible provider of skilled nursing home services the greater of the following amounts:

Medical assistance computed on the per diem base rate under the new base period established pursuant to this subsection; or

For the state fiscal year beginning July 1, 2003 and ending June 30, 2004, medical assistance computed on the per diem base rate existing prior to the establishment of the new base period under this subsection.

The department shall establish by rule the conditions and requirements for skilled nursing home extraordinary care. The requirements shall include, but are not limited to the following:

The care shall be previously authorized by the department for each individual and subject to continual audit by the department;

The cost for the care shall clearly exceed the standard skilled nursing home per diem rate;

The cost shall be excluded from the nursing home’s cost report to the department; and

No extraordinary care payment shall be made for equipment owned by the nursing home in providing the care.

The chief administrator of the Medicaid program created pursuant to this chapter shall be the state Medicaid agent within the department of health, who shall be appointed by the governor, shall serve at the pleasure of the governor and may be removed by the governor as provided by W.S.

9-1-202

. The state Medicaid agent shall oversee and coordinate all programs which provide Medicaid services or determine Medicaid eligibility pursuant to W.S.

42-4-106

and chapter 2 of this title.

History.

Laws 1967, ch. 238, §§ 6, 7; W.S. 1957, §§ 42-69, 42-70; W.S. 1977, §§

42-4-106

,

42-4-107

; Laws 1988, ch. 34, § 2; 1991, ch. 221, § 2; 1994, ch. 68, § 1; 2002 Sp. Sess., ch. 63, § 1; 2003, ch. 41, § 1; ch. 148, § 1; 2005, ch. 102, § 1; 2011, ch. 105, § 2; ch. 161, § 1; 2021 ch. 32, § 2, effective February 9, 2021.

Cross references. —

As to general powers and duties of department, see §

9-2-102

.

The 2005 amendments. —

The 2005 amendment, effective July 1, 2005, in (c), substituted “at least once” for “not less than”, and inserted “but not more than once in any three (3) year period”.

The 2011 amendments. —

The first 2011 amendment, by ch. 105, § 2, added (b)(x).

Laws 2011, ch. 105, § 3, makes the act effective immediately upon completion of all acts necessary for a bill to become law as provided by art. 4, § 8, Wyo. Const. Approved March 2, 2011.

The second 2011 amendment, by ch. 161 § 1, added (e).

Laws 2011, ch. 161 § 4, makes the act effective immediately upon completion of all acts necessary for a bill to become law as provided by art. 4, § 8, Wyo. Const. Approved March 3, 2011.

While neither
amendment gave effect to the other, both have been given effect in
this section as set out above.

The 2021 amendment,

rewrote (b)(ix), which read, "Enter into intergovernmental transfer arrangements with qualifying facilities in which all federal funding received as a result of the intergovernmental transfer arrangements shall be distributed to participating facilities."

Laws 2021, ch. 32, § 3, makes the act effective immediately upon completion of all acts necessary for a bill to become law as provided by
art. 4, § 8, Wyo. Const. Approved February 9, 2021.

Editor's notes. —

Laws 2006, ch. 40, § 4, effective July 1, 2006 provides:

“Medicaid waiver.

“(a) The department of health shall apply for a mental health waiver from the federal centers for Medicare and Medicaid services (CMS) to allow the provision of services under the mental health waiver to children who are in need of mental health services under the Wyoming Medical Assistance and Services Act, in such a manner that will not require the child's family to relinquish legal custody of the child. Children eligible under the waiver shall be required to:

“(i) Undergo an evaluation to determine a diagnosis and level of care;

“(ii) Meet the federal definition of a child with a serious emotional disturbance as defined in 34 C.F.R. part 300.7;

“(iii) Meet at least one (1) Medicaid criterion for inpatient psychiatric hospitalization;

“(iv) Receive a recommendation from a licensed mental health professional that the child can safely be served in his home, school and community; and

“(v) Meet Medicaid financial eligibility requirements based on the child's own resources, without regard to the resources of other members of the child's family unit.

“(b) Up to two hundred fifty (250) children may be served under the mental health waiver, if approved by CMS, on a first-come, first-served basis. The department shall screen children for eligibility prior to placing the child on a waiting list for services under the mental health waiver. The waiting list and the status of each child on the waiting list with respect to eligibility and the need for services shall be reviewed at least quarterly by the department.

“(c) For purposes of this section and contingent upon approval of the waiver by CMS, there is appropriated for the biennium beginning July 1, 2006, to the department of health, mental health division, the following amounts to implement the purposes of the mental health waiver:

“(i) Two million one hundred ninety-three thousand seven hundred forty dollars ($2,193,740.00) from the general fund;

“(ii) Two million four hundred six thousand two hundred sixty dollars ($2,406,260.00) from federal funds.

“(d) Subsection (a) of this section is effective immediately upon completion of all acts necessary for a bill to become law as provided by Article 4, Section 8 of the Wyoming Constitution. [March 11, 2006]”

Laws 2006, ch. 40, § 13, effective July 1, 2006, provides:

“Psychiatric residency rotation.

“(a) The University of Wyoming shall to the extent practicable enter into an agreement with the University of Washington medical school under which physician residents who are being trained in psychiatric residencies operated by the University of Washington will perform a psychiatric residency rotation within the state of Wyoming. In developing the agreement, the University of Wyoming shall consult with organizations or groups involved in planning for or providing graduate education in Wyoming. The agreement shall be consistent with the capacity of the psychiatric residency rotations and subject to legislative appropriation. Not later than November 15, 2006, the University of Wyoming shall report to the select committee on mental health and substance abuse services regarding the terms of the agreement with the University of Washington and the anticipated future of the program in terms of capacity and providing services to the public. If the University of Wyoming is unable to enter into an agreement with the University of Washington to establish psychiatric residency rotations, the University of Wyoming shall report to the select committee on the feasibility of contracting with psychiatric residencies in other states to offer psychiatric rotations in Wyoming.

“(b) There is appropriated one hundred sixty-eight thousand eight hundred dollars ($168,800.00) from the general fund to the medical education budget of the University of Wyoming for the biennium beginning July 1, 2006, to fund the Wyoming psychiatric residency rotation program. Any unexpended funds appropriated under this section shall revert to the general fund at the end of the biennium as provided in W.S. 9-4-207(a).

“(c) Subsection (a) of this section is effective immediately upon completion of all acts necessary for a bill to become law as provided by Article 4, Section 8 of the Wyoming Constitution. [March 11, 2006]”

Laws 2011, ch. 161 § 2 provides:

“(a) The director of the department of health may examine the programs and functions of the department, prepare a plan for the reorganization of the department and all other programs providing Medicaid services or determining Medicaid eligibility and submit the plan to the governor for approval. The department reorganization plan as approved by the governor, if it includes actions requiring changes in statutes, shall be submitted to the joint labor, health and social services and joint appropriations interim committees of the legislature no later than November 15, 2011, if it is to be considered at the 2012 budget session, or September 1, 2012, if it is to be considered at the 2013 general session, and made available to the public

“(b) Any reorganization plan proposing to create a new department developed pursuant to this section shall comply with the provisions of
W.S. 9-2-1707(a)(iii) except that the dates specified in this section shall govern, as appropriate.”

Wyoming Administrative Procedure Act. —

See § 16-3-101(a), (b)(xi).

Appropriations. —

Laws 2011, ch. 161, § 3 provides:

“(a) There is appropriated one hundred thousand dollars ($100,000.00) from the general fund to the office of the governor. This appropriation shall be for the period beginning with the effective date of this act and ending June 30, 2012. This appropriation shall only be expended for the purpose of retaining the services of an appropriate consultant to assist in the preparation of the plan authorized by this act.

“(b) Notwithstanding any other provision of law, this appropriation shall not be transferred or expended for any other purpose and any unexpended, unobligated funds remaining from this appropriation shall revert as provided by law on June 30, 2012.”

Temporary provisions. —

Laws 2004, ch. 103, § 1, authorizes the Wyoming health care commission with the assistance of the department of health to conduct a study of unreimbursed catastrophic costs incurred by Wyoming hospitals. The study is to (1) identify the magnitude of the problem; (2) determine the level of costs shifted to private pay and private insurance customers; (3) determine if access to services, especially trauma services, is endangered for both paying patients and patients unable to pay due to poverty; (4) determine if reimbursement problems are endangering implementation of an effective trauma care system in Wyoming; (5) determine if state, county or local hospital district financial support for reimbursement problems identified by the report will provide long term solutions to the reimbursement problems; (6) consider reasonable alternatives for reimbursing hospitals and other health care providers for unreimbursed catastrophic care and unreimbursed trauma care; (7) consider the differences in existing local support for hospitals and other local health care providers; (8) explore the cost feasibility of a state, county or local hospital district funded catastrophic insurance policy to cover all Wyoming citizens; (9) consider state, county, hospital district and other funding sources to address any needs identified by the study; and (10) if state support is identified as a reasonable long term option to address problems identified by the report, determine: (a) the long term financial impact to the state of the program; (b) the formula for distributing the funds; (c) potential revenue sources to cover the cost of the long term assistance; and (d) the impact of state support on the expansion or growth of trauma care programs because of the state support. The final report of the study is to be submitted to the joint labor, health and social services interim committee by October 1, 2004.

Laws 2004, ch. 103, § 2, appropriates to the health care commission $150,000 from the general fund to carry out the study.

Laws 2004, ch. 103, § 3, makes the act effective immediately upon completion of all acts necessary for a bill to become law as provided by art. 4, § 8, Wyo. Const. Approved March 11, 2004.

Cited in

Adekale v. State, 2015 WY 30,

2015 Wyo. LEXIS 34

(Feb. 26, 2015).

§ 42-4-105.
[Repealed.]

Repealed by Laws 1991, ch. 221, § 3.

Editor's notes. —

This section, which derived from Laws 1967, ch. 238, § 5, related to an advisory committee to the department of health and social services.

§ 42-4-106.
Application for assistance; determination of eligibility; assignment of benefits; resources and income allowances defined for institutionalized spouse.

Any Wyoming resident may apply for medical assistance under this chapter by filing an application by telephone, by mail, in person at the eligibility customer service center in Cheyenne, on the eligibility internet site or at a department of family services field office located in the county in which the individual resides. A determination of eligibility for medical assistance shall be based upon the application. Medical assistance shall be provided on behalf of a qualified applicant with reasonable promptness.

Upon signing an application for medical assistance under this chapter, an applicant assigns to the department any right to medical support or payment for medical expenses from any other person on his behalf or on behalf of any relative for whom application is made. The assignment is effective upon a determination of eligibility. Application for medical assistance shall contain an explanation of the assignment provided under this subsection.

In determining the eligibility of an institutionalized spouse for medical assistance under this chapter, the resources of the noninstitutionalized spouse shall not be considered available to the institutionalized spouse to the extent the amount of his resources does not exceed the maximum authorized by the Medicare Catastrophic Coverage Act of 1988, P.L. 100-360. For purposes of determining the amount of an institutionalized spouse’s monthly income to be applied towards payment of institutional care costs, the maximum amount of allowance authorized by the Medicare Catastrophic Coverage Act of 1988, P.L. 100-360 shall be deducted from his monthly income.

In any assistance program under this chapter for which income is the criterion or one (1) of the criteria for assistance payments, compensation received for a veteran’s service connected disability shall not be counted in determining income if that compensation on an annual basis is not more than the poverty level for the applicant as determined by the federal office of management and budget.

History.

Laws 1967, ch. 238, § 4; W.S. 1957, § 42-67; W.S. 1977, §

42-4-104

; Laws 1985, ch. 51, § 1; 1986, ch. 72, § 1; 1988, ch. 34, § 2; 1990, ch. 65, § 1; ch. 120, § 1; 1995, ch. 80, § 1; 1996, ch. 111, § 2; 1997, ch. 196, § 1; 2016 ch. 20, § 1, effective July 1, 2016.

Cross references. —

For definition of “institutionalized spouse,” see § 42-4-102(a)(vi) and notes thereto.

The 2016 amendment,

effective July 1, 2016, substituted “filing an application by telephone, by mail, in person at the eligibility customer service center in Cheyenne, on the eligibility internet site or at a department of family services field office” for “filing an application with the field office” in (a).

Medicare Catastrophic Coverage Act. —

See note under same catchline following §

42-4-102

.

Quoted

in

State ex rel. Department of Health v. Dairyland Ins. Co., 11 P.3d 348,

2000 Wyo. LEXIS 189

(Wyo. 2000).

Am. Jur. 2d, ALR and C.J.S. references. —

Transsexual surgery as covered operation under state medical assistance program, 2 ALR4th 775.

Eligibility for welfare benefits, under maximum-assets limitations, as affected by expenditures or disposal of assets, 19 ALR4th 146.

§ 42-4-107.
Uniform application throughout state; discrimination prohibited; pilot projects authorized.

This chapter and the state plan for medical assistance and services developed under W.S. 42-4-104(a)(ii) shall be uniformly applied within all political subdivisions of the state.

The provision of medical assistance to any applicant or qualified recipient shall not be denied or delayed and the administration of this chapter shall not otherwise discriminate against any applicant or recipient on the basis of race, creed, color, national origin, sex or mental or physical handicap.

Notwithstanding any other provision of this act [§§

42-4-104

and

42-4-107

], the department, in providing services and supplies authorized by this act, may conduct pilot projects pertaining to some or all categorically eligible individuals.

History.

Laws 1967, ch. 238, §§ 8, 9, 10; W.S. 1957, §§ 42-71, 42-72, 42-73; W.S. 1977, §§

42-4-108

,

42-4-109

,

42-4-110

; Laws 1988, ch. 34, § 2; 1994, ch. 68, § 1.

Editor's notes. —

Laws 2006, ch. 40, § 6, effective July 1, 2006, provides:

“Regional pilot project.

“(a) The department of health may enter into not more than one (1) contract for a pilot project within the state to enhance acute psychiatric services within a region it shall designate. The department of health, in consultation with the mental health division and the substance abuse division, shall designate a region of the state. The contract shall be entered into with a provider from not more than one (1) region that the department determines contains under-served areas that may benefit from services provided by the pilot project after competitive bidding. The contract shall include assurances that:

“(i) At least one (1) psychiatrist and other appropriate allied health care providers are available within the region to provide acute psychiatric services. If no psychiatrist practices within the region, the contracting provider will be responsible for the hiring of a psychiatrist before full funding associated with the acute psychiatric services under the contract is disbursed by the department;

“(ii) Transportation shall be available for clients to and from the treatment facility;

“(iii) Services shall be provided, as necessary, to enable clients to transition back into the community or to another more appropriate facility;

“(iv) Outcome measurements shall be developed and the outcomes documented, with due consideration of clients' privacy.

“(b) The contract under this section shall not be entered into unless and until the department:

“(i) Adopts rules designating authorized treatment hospitals under W.S.

25-10-104

;

“(ii) Ensures that it shall pay the costs of transportation to the contracted acute psychiatric care facilities; and

“(iii) Has developed and made available a voluntary training program for primary care physicians, mental health workers and allied health care providers to develop and enhance systems of care that can provide acute psychiatric care throughout the state.

“(c) There is appropriated one million four hundred three thousand one hundred dollars ($1,403,100.00), or as much thereof as is necessary, from the general fund to the department of health, mental health division, for the biennium beginning July 1, 2006, to implement the purposes of this section. Funds appropriated under this section shall be one-time funding and shall not be contained in the department's 2009-2010 standard budget request and shall only be expended to implement the one (1) pilot project authorized by this section. Any unexpended funds at the end of the biennium shall revert to the general fund as provided by W.S. 9-4-207(a).

“(d) The department may commence the solicitation of the potential contractor under this section through requests for proposals immediately.

“(e) Subsection (d) of this subsection is effective immediately upon completion of all acts necessary for a bill to become law as provided by Article 4, Section 8 of the Wyoming Constitution [March 11, 2006].”

§ 42-4-108.
Administrative hearings.

In accordance with the Wyoming Administrative Procedure Act, the department shall provide opportunity for a hearing to any individual denied medical assistance under this chapter or otherwise aggrieved by the administration of this chapter.

History.

Laws 1967, ch. 238, §§ 7, 11; W.S. 1957, §§ 42-70, 42-74; W.S. 1977, §§

42-4-107

,

42-4-111

; Laws 1988, ch. 34, § 2.

Wyoming Administrative Procedure Act. —

See § 16-3-101(a), (b)(xi).

§ 42-4-109.
[Renumbered and Repealed.]

and (b) Renumbered as § 42-4-207(a) and (b) by Laws 1994, ch. 73, § 2.

Repealed by Laws 1994, ch. 73, § 3.

Renumbered as § 42-4-207(f) by Laws 1994, ch. 73, § 2.

§ 42-4-110.
Charges for inpatient hospital services.

A cost deduction, cost sharing or other similar charge shall not be imposed upon any recipient of medical assistance for inpatient hospital services provided on his behalf pursuant to this chapter.

History.

Laws 1967, ch. 238, § 13; W.S. 1957, § 42-76; W.S. 1977, §

42-4-113

; Laws 1988, ch. 34, § 2.

§ 42-4-111.
Providing or obtaining assistance by misrepresentation; penalties.

and (b) Repealed by Laws 2019, ch. 96, § 3.

No person shall knowingly make a false statement or misrepresentation or knowingly fail to disclose a material fact in obtaining medical assistance under this chapter. A person violating this subsection is guilty of a misdemeanor punishable by imprisonment for not more than six (6) months, a fine of not more than seven hundred fifty dollars ($750.00), or both.

and (e) Repealed by Laws 2019, ch. 96, § 3.

History.

Laws 1967, ch. 238, § 14; W.S. 1957, § 42-77; W.S. 1977, §

42-4-114

; Laws 1988, ch. 34, § 2; 2013 ch. 118, § 2, effective July 1, 2013; 2019 ch. 96, § 3, effective February 26, 2019.

Effective Dates

Laws 2019, ch. 96 § 4, makes the act effective immediately upon completion of all acts necessary for a bill to become law as provided by
art. 4, § 8 of the Wyo. Const. Approved February 26, 2019.

The 2013 amendment,

effective July 1, 2013, added (e).

The 2019 amendment,

repealed (a), which read: "No person shall knowingly make a false statement or misrepresentation or knowingly fail to disclose a material fact in providing medical assistance under this chapter"; repealed (b), which prescribed criminal penalties as specified for violation of (a); repealed (d), which read: "Each violation of subsection (a) of this section is a separate offense"; and repealed (e) which prescribed criminal penalties as specified for failure to maintain required records.

Generally.

Effectiveness of counsel.

Generally.

Wyo. Stat. Ann. §

42-4-111

unambiguously establishes the unit of prosecution for false statement charges. Under Wyo. Stat. Ann. §

42-4-111

(d), each violation of Wyo. Stat. Ann. § 42-4-111(a) is a separate offense. Therefore, the Wyoming Legislature expressly intended a violation to be the unit of prosecution under § 42-4-111(a). Mellott v. State, 2019 WY 23, 435 P.3d 376,

2019 Wyo. LEXIS 23

(Wyo. 2019).

Plain language of Wyo. Stat. Ann. § 42-4-111(a) and (d), together, with the statutory definition of medical assistance as applied to providers in case law, clearly demonstrates the legislature’s intent to criminalize individual acts that violate § 42-4-111(a) as separate chargeable offenses. When a provider falsely states something, misrepresents something, or knowingly fails to disclose a material fact in any given Medicaid claim submitted for payment, the provider violates § 42-4-111(a). Whether any given violation vis-`-vis an individual claim for payment constitutes a felony or a misdemeanor offense expressly depends on the dollar value of that particular claim for payment. Wyo. Stat. Ann. § 42-4-111(a)-(b). Mellott v. State, 2019 WY 23, 435 P.3d 376,

2019 Wyo. LEXIS 23

(Wyo. 2019).

Medical assistance, as it applies to violating Wyo. Stat. Ann. § 42-4-111(a), means an individual claim for payment to a provider. Wyo. Stat. Ann. § 42-4-111(d) requires the State to charge individual violations of § 42-4-111(a) as separate offenses, and Wyo. Stat. Ann. § 42-4-111(b)(i) requires the value of the medical assistance related to an individual violation to be $500 or more to qualify as a felony. Mellott v. State, 2019 WY 23, 435 P.3d 376,

2019 Wyo. LEXIS 23

(Wyo. 2019).

Effectiveness of counsel.

On trial counsel’s advice, defendant had pled guilty to 10 felony counts under Wyo. Stat. Ann. § 42-4-111(a) without a factual basis to satisfy the felony threshold, and thus, trial counsel’s performance was deficient. Because the record, including the sentencing hearing and plea withdrawal proceedings, did not show a factual basis for her guilty plea as to those felony counts, defendant was prejudiced by her trial counsel’s deficient performance. Mellott v. State, 2019 WY 23, 435 P.3d 376,

2019 Wyo. LEXIS 23

(Wyo. 2019).

Law reviews. —

For article, “The Wyoming Criminal Code Revisited: Reflections after Fifteen Years,” see XXXIII Land and Water L. Rev. 523 (1998).

Am. Jur. 2d, ALR and C.J.S. references. —

Imposition of civil penalties, under state statute, upon medical practitioner for fraud in connection with claims under medicaid, medicare or similar welfare programs for providing medical services, 32 ALR4th 671.

§ 42-4-112.
Confidentiality of records; penalty for disclosure; authorized disclosure.

Any application, information and record obtained, compiled and maintained for an applicant or qualified recipient of medical assistance under this chapter is confidential and shall not be disclosed or used for any purpose other than the administration of this chapter.

A violation of subsection (a) of this section is a misdemeanor.

Notwithstanding subsection (a) of this section and any other provision of law to the contrary, and for purposes of ensuring any medical assistance under this act [§§

42-4-101

through

42-4-208

] does not duplicate any benefit payment made by another state agency, insurer, group health plan, third party administrator, health maintenance organization or similar entity, the department may upon request of the state agency, insurer or similar entity, disclose information limited to a recipient’s name, social security number, amount of payment, charge for services, date of services and services rendered relating to medical assistance payments made under this act. A state agency, insurer, group health plan, health maintenance organization or similar entity shall, upon request of the department, disclose the same limited information to the department. Information received under this subsection shall be used only for the purpose authorized by this subsection and shall otherwise be confidential and the state agency, insurer, group health plan, health maintenance organization or other recipient entity shall be subject to the confidentiality restrictions imposed by law upon information received to the extent required of the department. Any violation of this subsection is a misdemeanor punishable by imprisonment for not more than six (6) months, a fine of not more than seven hundred fifty dollars ($750.00), or both.

Prior to receipt of any payment under this act, the department shall require an applicant for or recipient of assistance under this act to sign a waiver authorizing the release of information limited to assistance payment information to state agencies, insurers, group health plans, third party administrators, health maintenance organizations or similar entities for purposes specified by subsection (c) of this section.

History.

Laws 1967, ch. 238, § 15; W.S. 1957, § 42-78; W.S. 1977, §

42-4-115

; Laws 1988, ch. 34, § 2; 1995, ch. 145, § 1.

Cross references. —

As to penalties for misdemeanors, see §

6-10-103

.

Am. Jur. 2d, ALR and C.J.S. references. —

Confidentiality of records as to recipients of public welfare, 54 ALR3d 768.

§ 42-4-113.
Eligibility criteria; irrevocable burial trusts.

The department shall not consider as assets available to an applicant seeking medical assistance the corpus of a Medicaid qualifying trust:

That is irrevocable;

In which the trustee and trustor retain no discretion with respect to distributions to the applicant;

In which the income from the trust shall be transferred to the applicant at least annually;

In which the trust corpus shall not exceed five thousand dollars ($5,000.00); and

In which the trust corpus is specifically and irrevocably designated, assigned, or pledged for payment of the applicant’s burial expenses.

If any of the trust corpus remains after payment of burial expenses, that remainder shall be transferred to the department to be used in the medical assistance program.

History.

Laws 1989, ch. 107, § 1.

§ 42-4-114.
Cooperative agreements authorized.

The department may enter into a cooperative agreement and may contract with private attorneys to provide legal services and legal representation necessary to assist the department in enforcing its right to reimbursement created under article 2 of this chapter. The department and its contract attorneys shall have an unconditional right to intervene in any action by or on behalf of a recipient or former recipient against any third party who may be legally liable to reimburse any medical assistance provided under the Wyoming Medicaid program. If no action has been brought, the department and its contract attorneys may initiate and prosecute an independent action on behalf of the department against any third party that may be liable to the person to whom the care was furnished. If the department elects not to contract with private attorneys to provide legal services and representation under this section, the attorney general, or an appropriate county attorney, shall provide the legal services and representation.

History.

Laws 1993, ch. 118, § 1; 1999, ch. 125, § 1.

§ 42-4-115.
Work incentives improvement option; purchase of services; eligibility criteria; definition.

The department may amend the state plan for medical assistance and services developed under W.S. 42-4-104(a)(ii) to allow individuals with countable income not to exceed three hundred percent (300%) of the supplemental security income level to receive services authorized under W.S. 42-4-103(a), provided that:

and (ii) Repealed by Laws 2002, Sp. Sess., ch. 31, § 2.

The individual is eligible to buy into the Wyoming Medical Assistance and Services Act under the federal Ticket to Work and Work Incentive Improvement Act of 1999 and subsequent similar federal enactments and the federal government is not restricted from paying its proportionate share of the individual’s eligible medical expenses;

Provided that the individual’s earnings do not exceed the level specified in section 201(a)(3) of the Federal Ticket to Work and Work Incentive Improvement Act of 1999; and

The individual pays to the department a premium of seven and one-half percent (7.5%) of his total gross earnings from work and seven and one-half percent (7.5%) of his unearned income in excess of six hundred dollars ($600.00) per year, provided that:

The total paid in premiums under this section does not exceed the yearly premium as calculated pursuant to W.S.

42-4-116

; and

The individual is not liable for more than the full premium calculated pursuant to W.S.

42-4-116

.

If the federal government does not allow a state plan amendment containing the expense limitations provided in paragraphs (a)(i) and (ii) of this section or provisions with similar fiscal effects, the state plan amendment authorized by this section shall not be implemented without specific legislative authorization.

With respect to the premium received pursuant to subsection (a) of this section, the department shall deduct and forward to the federal government any amount owed under federal regulations. Any overpaid premium shall be refunded to the individual and the balance shall be deposited in the general fund. The sum of all amounts deposited under this section shall be reported in the biennial budget submissions to the joint appropriations interim committee as premium earned to offset the expenses of the program.

Repealed by Laws 2015, ch. 54 § 2.

and (f) Repealed by Laws 2002, Sp. Sess., ch. 31, § 2.

History.

Laws 2000, ch. 100, § 1; 2002 Sp. Sess., ch. 31, §§ 1, 2; 2005, ch. 134, § 1; 2015 ch. 54, § 2, effective July 1, 2015.

The 2005 amendment,

effective July 1, 2005, substituted “countable income not to exceed three hundred percent (300%) of the supplemental security income level” for“ income or assets not to exceed one hundred percent (100%) of the federal poverty level” in (a).

The 2015 amendment,

effective July 1, 2015, repealed (d), pertaining to the telephone assistance program.

Editor's note. —

Laws 2000, ch. 100, § 2, had provided that this section would be repealed on July 1, 2004. That repealer was repealed by Laws 2002, Sp. Sess., ch. 31, § 2., and replaced by Laws 2002, Sp. Sess., ch. 31, § 4, which repealed this section effective July 1, 2006. Laws 2005, ch. 134, § 4, repealed Laws 2000, ch. 100, § 2, and Laws 2002, Sp. Sess., ch. 31, § 4, such that this section is no longer repealed.

Ticket to Work and Work Incentive Improvement Act of 1999. —

As to the federal Ticket to Work and Work Incentive Improvement Act of 1999 see 42 U.S.C. § 1320b-19.

Appropriations. —

Laws 2005, ch. 134, § 3, appropriates $113,400 from federal funds and $96,600 from the general fund to the department of health for the purposes of the act.

Temporary provisions. —

Laws 2005, ch. 134, § 2, directs the department to report to the joint labor, health and social services interim committee and the joint appropriations interim committee on or before October 1, 2005 and 2006, on the expenditure of amounts appropriated under the section and provide recommendations on program continuation.

§ 42-4-116.
Premium calculation.

The calculation of premium for services under W.S.

42-4-115

shall be as follows:

Determine the total expenses of the Medicaid program for the most recent state fiscal year and the total number of clients in the Medicaid program served in that period;

Deduct from the totals in paragraph (i) of this subsection the clients over the age of sixty-five (65) years and the expenses associated with those clients;

Divide the resulting expenses calculated pursuant to paragraph (ii) of this subsection by the clients remaining after the deduction pursuant to paragraph (ii) of this subsection. The result is the basic annual premium;

Add to the basic premium a risk factor of fifty percent (50%) of the basic premium to recover additional costs incurred by the population eligible to be served pursuant to W.S.

42-4-115

; and

The premium shall be the sum of the basic annual premium calculated pursuant to paragraph (iii) of this subsection and the risk factor calculated pursuant to paragraph (iv) of this subsection.

History.

Laws 2000, ch. 100, § 1; 2002 Sp. Sess., ch. 31, § 2.

Editor's notes. —

There is no subsection (b) in this section as it appears in the printed acts.

Laws 2000, ch. 100, § 2, had provided that this section would be repealed on July 1, 2004. That repealer was repealed by Laws 2002, Sp. Sess., ch. 31, § 2, and replaced by Laws 2002, Sp. Sess., ch. 31, § 4, which repealed this section effective July 1, 2006. Laws 2005, ch. 134, § 4, repealed Laws 2000, ch. 100, § 2, and Laws 2002, Sp. Sess., ch. 31, § 4, such that this section is no longer repealed.

§ 42-4-117.
End stage renal dialysis program; rulemaking; funding.

Effective July 1, 2001, the department shall expand coverage for services authorized under W.S. 42-4-103(a)(xxiii) for qualified individuals in need of end stage renal dialysis to the extent funding is available.

The department shall by rule and regulation establish reasonable limits on services and supplies authorized under this section, including establishing eligibility criteria for receipt of services. In establishing eligibility criteria, the department shall consider financial ability of the individual or his family to contribute to the services, severity of the illness, the critical need for the services and the ability of the program to meet the needs of the individual.

History.

Laws 2001, ch. 128, § 1.